Utah statutes.
70A-1a-305.   Remedies to be liberally administered.

(1)  The remedies provided by this title must be liberally administered to the end that the aggrieved party may be put in as good a position as if the other party had fully performed but neither consequential or special damages nor penal damages may be had except as specifically provided in this title or by other rule of law.

(2)  Any right or obligation declared by this title is enforceable by action unless the provision declaring it specifies a different and limited effect.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 2007 General Session

